District of Columbia statutes.
7-2906

Office space and staffing.

(a)

The Mayor shall provide sufficient office space, detail staff, and technical and administrative support to assist the Commission in the fulfillment of its duties.

(b)

The Commission shall have the authority to request directly from each department, agency, or instrumentality of the District government, and each department, agency, or instrumentality is hereby authorized to furnish directly to the Commission upon its request, any information deemed necessary by the Commission to carry out its functions under this subchapter.

History

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 1307, 46 DCR 6373